District of Columbia statutes.
19-312

Share of grandfather and grandmother.

The grandparents, or such of them as survive, share alike where there are no collaterals.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 19-312.
1973 Ed., § 19-312.